en: organic pasteurized butter
ca: mantega pasteuritzada ecològica
de: pasteurisierter Bio Butter
es: mantequilla pasteurizada ecológica
fr: beurre bio pasteurisé
hr: organski pasterizirani maslac
hu: bio pasztőrözött vaj, bio pasztörizált vaj, bio hőkezelt vaj
it: burro pastorizzato bio

en: Charentes butter PDO
de: Charentes-Poitou Butter g.U. , Butter Charentes-Poitou g.U.
fr: Beurre Charentes-Poitou AOP, Beurre des Charentes
hr: charentes maslac ZOI
it: burro di Charentes DOP

en: fresh butter
ca: mantega fresca
de: frische Butter
es: mantequilla fresca
fi: tuore voi
fr: beurre frais
hr: svježi maslac
hu: friss vaj
it: burro fresco
nl: verse boter
pt: manteiga fresca

fr: beurre laitier
nl: melkerijboter

en: reconstituted butter
bg: възобновена сметана
ca: mantega deshidratada reconstituïda
de: rekonstituierte Butter
es: mantequilla deshidratada reconstituida
fi: ennastettu voi, rekombinoitu voi
fr: beurre concentré reconstitué, beurre déshydraté reconstitué
hr: rekonstituirani maslac
it: burro ricostituito
lt: sviesto milteliai
nl: gereconstitueerde boter

en: sweet cream butter
de: Süßrahmbutter, Süßrahm-Butter
fi: imelä voi
fr: Beurre de crème pasteurisée
hr: maslac od slatkog vrhnja
it: Burro di panna dolce

fr: poudre au beurre, poudre de beurre
ca: mantega en pols
es: mantequilla en polvo
fi: voijauho
nl: boterpoeder

en: irish butter mildly acidified
de: Irische Butter mildgesäuert
it: burro irlandese leggermente acidificato

en: goat butter
hr: kozji maslac
it: burro di capra

en: milk, milk ingredients
af: Melk
am: ወተት
an: Leit
ar: الحليب, حليب
as: গাখীৰ
ay: Millk'i, süd
az: Süd
ba: Һөт
be: Малако
bg: Мляко, млечна
bm: Nɔnɔ
bn: দুধ
br: Laezh
bs: Mlijeko
ca: llet, ingredients de la llet
ce: Шура
co: Latti
cs: mléko, mléka
cv: Сĕт
cy: Llaeth
da: Mælk, mælke, mælks
de: Milch, Milchbestandteile
el: Γάλα, γάλακτος
eo: lakto
es: Leche, Ingredientes de leche
et: Piim, piimast, piima
eu: Esne
fa: شیر
fi: maito, maidosta, maitoaineksia
fo: Mjólk
fr: Lait, substances laitières
fy: Molke
ga: Bainne
gd: Bainne
gl: Leite
gn: Kamby
gu: દૂધ
gv: Bainney
he: חלב
hr: mlijeko, mlijeka, mliječna, mliječno, mliječnih sastojaka
ht: Lèt
hu: Tej, Tejet, tejből, tej összetevők
hy: Կաթ
ia: Lacte
id: Susu
ik: Immuk
is: Mjólk
it: Latte, ingredienti del latte
iu: ᐃᒻᒧᒃ
ja: 乳
jv: Susu
ka: რძე
kk: Сүт
kn: ಮಿಲ್ಕ್
ko: 젖, 유
ku: Şîr
ky: Сүт
la: Lac
lb: Mëllech
li: Mèlk
ln: Míliki
lo: ນົມ
lt: Pienas, pieno, pieniniai
lv: Piens, piena
mg: Ronono
mk: Млеко
ml: പാൽ
mn: Сүү
mr: दूध
ms: Susu
mt: ħalib
my: နို့
nb: Melk, Melke
ne: दूध
nl: melk, melkbestanddelen
nn: Mjølk
no: melk
nv: Abeʼ
oc: Lach, lait, lèit
or: କ୍ଷୀର
pa: ਦੁੱਧ
pl: mleko, mleka, mleczny, mleczna
ps: شيدې
pt: Leite
qu: Lichi, Pilli
ro: Lapte
ru: Молоко, нормализованное молоко, молоко нормализованное, молоко нормализованное пастеризованное, молоко нормализованное по содержанию жира
sa: क्षीरम्
sd: کير
sh: Mlijeko
si: සත්ත්‍ව කිරි
sk: Mlieko
sl: mleko
sn: Mukaka
so: Caano
sq: Qumështi, qumesht
sr: Млеко
su: Susu
sv: Mjölk
sw: Maziwa
ta: பால்
te: పాలు
tg: Шир
th: นม, น้ำนม
tl: Gatas
tr: Süt
tt: Сөт
uk: Молоко
ur: دودھ
vi: Sữa
wa: Laecea
yi: מילך
zh: 乳, 奶
zu: Ubisi

en: milk enriched with cream
de: Milch angereichert mit Rahm
fr: lait enrichi de crème
hr: mlijeko obogaćeno vrhnjem
it: latte arrichito con crema

en: Follow-on milk
ca: llet de seguiment
de: Folgemilch
es: leche de seguimiento
fi: vieroitusvalmiste
fr: lait de suite
hr: naknadno mlijeko
it: latte di proseguimento

en: milk from France
de: Milch aus Frankreich
fr: lait origine france
hr: mlijeko iz Francuske
it: latte origine Francia, latte francese
nl: melk uit Frankrijk

en: haymilk
de: Heumilch, Heumilch g.t.S.
es: leche de heno
fr: lait de foin
hr: mlijeko od sijena
it: latte fieno, latte fieno STG

en: skimmed milk, skim milk, non-fat milk, nonfat milk, fat-free milk, low-fat milk, 1% fat milk, lowfat milk
ar: حليب منزوع الدسم
bg: обезмаслено мляко
ca: llet descremada, llet desnatada, llet sense greix, llet baixa en greixos
cs: Odstředěné mléko
da: skummetmælk
de: Magermilch, entrahmte Milch, fettarme Milch
es: Leche descremada, Leche desnatada, leche sin grasas, Leche baja en grasa
et: Lõss
fa: شیر خشک بدون چربی
fi: rasvaton maito, Vähärasvainen maito
fr: lait écrémé, lait maigre
gl: Leite desnatado
he: חלב רזה
hr: obrano mlijeko, obrane mlijeko, obrani mlijeko
hu: sovány tej, fölözött tej, alacsony zsírtartalmú tej
id: Susu skim
is: Undanrenna
it: Latte scremato, latte senza grassi, latte magro
lt: Nugriebtas pienas
lv: vājpiens
mk: обрано млеко
ms: Susu skim
nb: Skummet melk, skummetmelk
nl: Magere melk, Taptemelk, ondermelk, afgeroomde melk, vetvrije melk
no: skummet melk
pa: ਸਪਰੇਟਾ
pl: odtłuszczone mleko, mleko odtłuszczone
pt: Leite desnatado, leite magro
ru: Обезжиренное молоко, молоко обезжиренное
sv: Skummjölk, lättmjölk
uk: Знежирене молоко
vi: Sữa gầy
zh: 脱脂牛奶

en: pasteurized skimmed milk
bg: пастьоризирано обезмаслено мляко
ca: llet desnatada pasteuritzada, llet pasteuritzada desnatada, llet pasteuritzada descremada, llet descremada pasteuritzada
de: pasteurisierte Magermilch, pasteurisierter Magermilch
es: leche desnatada pasteurizada, leche pasteurizada desnatada, leche pasteurizada descremada, leche descremada pasteurizada
fi: pastöroitu rasvaton maito
fr: lait écrémé pasteurisé
hu: pasztőrözött sovány tej, pasztörizál sovány tej, hőkezelt sovány tej
it: latte magro pastorizzato
ja: パスチャライズ牛乳
lt: pasterizuotas nugriebtas pienas
nb: pasteurisert skummet melk
nl: gepasteuriseerde magere melk
pt: leite pasteurizado desnatado, leite desnatado pasteurizado
sv: pastöriserad skummjölk

en: UHT sterilised skimmed milk, UHT skimmed milk, ultra heat treated skimmed milk
ca: llet descremada esterilitzada UHT, llet desnatada esterilitzada UHT
de: entrahmte H-Milch
es: leche descremada esterilizada UHT, leche desnatada esterilizada UHT, leche UHT descremada
fr: Lait écrémé stérilisé UHT, lait écrémé stérilisé u h t, lait stérilisé uht écrémé
hr: uht sterilizirano obrano mlijeko
hu: sovány UHT tej
it: latte scremato UHT sterilizzato
nl: UHT-gesteriliseerde magere melk

en: semi-skimmed milk, reduced-fat milk, partly skimmed milk, partially skimmed milk, part skim milk
bg: полуобезмаслено мляко
ca: llet parcialment desnatada, llet semidesnatada, llet parcialment desgreixada
da: letmælk
de: teilentrahmte milch, Halbentrahmte Milch
es: leche parcialmente desnatada, leche semidesnatada, Leche semidescremada, leche parcialmente descremada
fi: kevytmaito
fr: lait demi-écrémé, lait partiellement écrémé, lait semi-écrémé, Lait à 15.5 g/l de matière grasse
hr: djelomično obrano mlijeko, djelimično obrano mlijeko
hu: zsírszegény tej, félzsíros tej
is: léttmjólk
it: latte parzialmente scremato, Latte semiscremato
nb: lettmelk
nl: halfvolle melk, gedeeltelijk afgeroomde melk
pl: Mleko półtłuste
pt: leite meio gordo, leite semidesnatado
sv: mellanmjölk

fr: lait demi écrémé uht, lait stérilisé u h t demi-écrémé, lait demi-écrémé stérilisé uht, lait stérilisé uht demi-écrémé, lait demi-écrémé stérilisé u.h.t
ca: llet parcialment desnatada esterilitzada UHT, llet semidesnatada esterilitzada UHT
de: fettarme Haltbarmilch, fettarme H-milch
es: leche parcialmente desnatada esterilizada UHT, leche semidesnatada esterilizada UHT, leche UHT parcialmente descremada
it: Latte semiscremato UHT
nl: halfvolle melk uht verhit
pt: leite UHT meio gordo, leite meio gordo UHT

en: pasteurized semi-skimmed milk
bg: пастьоризирано полуобезмаслено мляко
ca: llet parcialment desnatada pasteuritzada, llet pasteuritzada parcialment desnatada, llet semidesnatada pasteuritzada, llet pasteuritzada semidesnatada
de: pasteurisierte teilentrahmte Milch
es: leche parcialmente desnatada pasteurizada, leche semidesnatada pasteurizada, leche pasteurizada parcialmente desnatada, leche pasteurizada semidesnatada, leche parcialmente descremada pasteurizada
fi: pastöroitu kevytmaito
fr: lait demi-écrémé pasteurisé, lait partiellement écrémé pasteurisé, lait pasteurise demi écrémé
hr: pasterizirano djelomično obrano mlijeko
hu: pasztőrözött zsírszegény tej
it: latte pastorizzato parzialmente scremato, latte parzialmente scremato pastorizzato
nl: gepasteuriseerde halfvolle melk
pt: Leite pasteurizado parcialmente desnatado